Nebraska, session 109, LB545.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB545 LB545
2025 2025
Section 1. (1)(a) A person, manufacturer, or distributor shall not
be subject to civil or criminal liability arising from the nature, age,
packaging, or condition of an apparently usable menstrual product that
such person, manufacturer, or distributor donates in good faith to a
nonprofit organization for ultimate distribution to an individual in need
of such product.
(b) A nonprofit organization shall not be subject to civil or
criminal liability arising from the nature, age, packaging, or condition
of an apparently usable menstrual product that such nonprofit
organization received in good faith from a person, manufacturer, or
distributor for ultimate distribution to an individual in need of such
product.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to an act or
omission of any person, manufacturer, distributor, or nonprofit
organization that constitutes gross negligence or intentional misconduct
and results in injury to, or death of, a user or recipient of a menstrual
product.
(3) For purposes of this section:
(a) Apparently usable means, with respect to a menstrual product,
that the product meets all quality and labeling standards imposed by
federal, state, and local laws and regulations whether or not the product
is readily marketable; and
(b) Menstrual product means a sanitary napkin, tampon, liner, cup,
underwear and any similar item used by an individual for menstruation.
-2-